Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3655.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; I-494 CORRIDOR COMMISSION.new text end new text begin (a) $300,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the Metropolitan Council for a grant to the I-494 Corridor Commission to provide programming and service expansion, including but not limited to staffing, communications, outreach and education program development, and operations management. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, the council must not retain or use any amount of the grant award under this section for administrative costs. The council must make grant payments in full by June 30, 2026. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end